Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXV Domestic Relations
Article 3. Judicial Procedure for Granting Custodial Responsibility During Deployment.

403A.301.
Close and substantial relationship defined.

As used in KRS

403A.301

to

403A.311

, “close and substantial relationship” means a relationship in which a significant bond exists between a child and a nonparent.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 94, § 13, effective June 29, 2021.

403A.302.
Proceeding for temporary custody order.

After a deploying parent receives notice of deployment and until the deployment terminates, a court may issue a temporary order granting custodial responsibility unless prohibited by the Servicemembers Civil Relief Act, 50 U.S.C. Appendix Sections 521 and 522. A court may not issue a permanent order granting custodial responsibility without the consent of the deploying parent.

At any time after a deploying parent receives notice of deployment, either parent may file a motion regarding custodial responsibility of a child during deployment. The motion shall be filed in a pending proceeding for custodial responsibility in a court with jurisdiction under KRS

403A.104

or, if there is no pending proceeding in a court with jurisdiction under KRS

403A.104

, in a new action for granting custodial responsibility during deployment.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 94, § 14, effective June 29, 2021.

403A.303.
Expedited hearing.

If a motion to grant custodial responsibility is filed under KRS 403A.302(2) before a deploying parent deploys, the court shall conduct an expedited hearing.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 94, § 15, effective June 29, 2021.

403A.304.
Testimony by electronic means.

In a proceeding under KRS

403A.301

to

403A.311

, a party or witness who is not reasonably available to appear personally may appear, provide testimony, and present evidence by electronic means unless the court finds good cause to require a personal appearance.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 94, § 16, effective June 29, 2021.

403A.305.
Effect of prior judicial order or agreement.

In a proceeding for a grant of custodial responsibility pursuant to KRS

403A.301

to

403A.311

, the following rules apply:

A prior judicial order designating custodial responsibility in the event of deployment is binding on the court unless the circumstances meet the requirements of law of this state other than this chapter for modifying a judicial order regarding custodial responsibility; and

The court shall enforce a prior written agreement between the parents for designating custodial responsibility in the event of deployment, including an agreement executed under KRS

403A.201

to

403A.205

, unless the court finds that the agreement is contrary to the best interest of the child.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 94, § 17, effective June 29, 2021.

403A.306.
Grant of caretaking or decision-making authority to nonparent.

On motion of a deploying parent and in accordance with law of this state other than this chapter, if it is in the best interest of the child, a court may grant caretaking authority to a nonparent who is an adult family member of the child or an adult with whom the child has a close and substantial relationship.

Unless a grant of caretaking authority to a nonparent under subsection (1) of this section is agreed to by the other parent, the grant is limited to an amount of time not greater than:

The amount of time granted to the deploying parent under a permanent custody order, but the court may add unusual travel time necessary to transport the child; or

In the absence of a permanent custody order that is currently in effect, the amount of time that the deploying parent habitually cared for the child before being notified of deployment, but the court may add unusual travel time necessary to transport the child.

A court may grant part of a deploying parent’s decision-making authority, if the deploying parent is unable to exercise that authority, to a nonparent who is an adult family member of the child or an adult with whom the child has a close and substantial relationship. If a court grants the authority to a nonparent, the court shall specify the decision-making powers granted, including decisions regarding the child’s education, religious training, health care, extracurricular activities, and travel.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 94, § 18, effective June 29, 2021.

403A.307.
Grant of limited contact.

On motion of a deploying parent, and in accordance with law of this state other than this chapter, unless the court finds that the contact would be contrary to the best interest of the child, a court shall grant limited contact to a nonparent who is a family member of the child or an individual with whom the child has a close and substantial relationship.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 94, § 19, effective June 29, 2021.

403A.308.
Nature of authority created by temporary custody order.

A grant of authority under KRS

403A.301

to

403A.311

is temporary and terminates under KRS

403A.401

to

403A.404

after the return from deployment of the deploying parent, unless the grant has been terminated before that time by court order. The grant does not create an independent, continuing right to caretaking authority, decision-making authority, or limited contact in an individual to whom it is granted.

A nonparent granted caretaking authority, decision-making authority, or limited contact under KRS

403A.301

to

403A.311

has standing to enforce the grant until it is terminated by court order or under KRS

403A.401

to

403A.404

.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 94, § 20, effective June 29, 2021.

403A.309.
Content of temporary custody order.

An order granting custodial responsibility under this article shall:

Designate the order as temporary; and

Identify to the extent feasible the destination, duration, and conditions of the deployment.

If applicable, an order for custodial responsibility under KRS

403A.301

to

403A.311

shall:

Specify the allocation of caretaking authority, decision-making authority, or limited contact among the deploying parent, the other parent, and any nonparent;

If the order divides caretaking or decision-making authority between individuals, or grants caretaking authority to one (1) individual and limited contact to another, provide a process to resolve any dispute that may arise;

Provide for liberal communication between the deploying parent and the child during deployment, including through electronic means, unless contrary to the best interest of the child, and allocate any costs of communication;

Provide for liberal contact between the deploying parent and the child during the time the deploying parent is on leave or otherwise available, unless contrary to the best interest of the child;

Provide for the reasonable contact between the deploying parent and the child after return from deployment until the temporary order is terminated, even if the time of contact exceeds the time the deploying parent spent with the child before entry of the temporary order; and

Provide that the order will terminate pursuant to KRS

403A.401

to

403A.404

after the deploying parent returns from deployment.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 94, § 21, effective June 29, 2021.

403A.310.
Order for child support.

If a court has issued an order granting caretaking authority under this article, or an agreement granting caretaking authority has been executed under KRS

403A.201

to

403A.205

, the court may enter a temporary order for child support consistent with law of this state other than this chapter if the court has jurisdiction under the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, KRS

407.5101

to

407.5902

.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 94, § 22, effective June 29, 2021.

403A.311.
Modifying or terminating grant of custodial responsibility to nonparent.

Except for an order under KRS

403A.305

, except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, and consistent with the Servicemembers Civil Relief Act, 50 U.S.C. Appendix Sections 521 and 522, on motion of a deploying or other parent or any nonparent to whom caretaking authority, decision-making authority, or limited contact has been granted, the court may modify or terminate the grant if the modification or termination is consistent with KRS

403A.301

to

403A.311

and it is in the best interest of the child. A modification is temporary and terminates pursuant to KRS

403A.401

to

403A.404

after the deploying parent returns from deployment, unless the grant has been terminated before that time by court order.

On motion of a deploying parent, the court shall terminate a grant of limited contact.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 94, § 23, effective June 29, 2021.